Louisiana, session 2026, HB903.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 22:18(A), 257(B), 1019.3(D)(2), 1529(B), 1554(A)(introductory
paragraph), 1672(A)(introductory paragraph), 1770, and 1808.8(A)(introductory paragraph)
are hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§18. Suspension or revocation of insurers' licenses; fines; orders
A. The commissioner of insurance may, as a penalty, in accordance with R.S.
49:977.3, refuse to renew, or may suspend or revoke, the certificate of authority or
license of any insurer, person, or entity violating any of the provisions of this Code,
or in lieu of suspension or revocation of a certificate or license duly issued, the
commissioner may levy a fine not to exceed one thousand dollars for each violation
per insurer, person, or entity, up to one hundred thousand million dollars aggregate
for all violations in a calendar year per insurer, person, or entity, when if such
violations warrant the refusal, suspension, or revocation of such certificate or license,
or the imposition of the fine. The commissioner is also authorized to may also order
any insurer, person, or entity to cease and desist any such action that violates any
provision of this Code. An aggrieved party affected by the commissioner's decision,
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 903 ENROLLED
act, or order may demand a hearing in accordance with Chapter 12 of this Title, R.S.
22:2191 et seq. If the insurer has demanded a timely hearing, the penalty or fine
ordered by the commissioner shall not be imposed until such time as the division of
administrative law makes a finding that the penalty or fine is warranted in a proper
hearing held in the manner provided in Chapter 12 of this Title.
* * *
§257. Suspension or revocation of certificate of authority
* * *
B. A certificate of authority shall be suspended or revoked only after
compliance with the requirements of R.S. 22:259 except in cases where such delay
would cause irreparable harm or substantial monetary loss in the opinion of the
commissioner. In lieu of suspension or revocation of a license duly issued, the
commissioner may levy a fine not to exceed one thousand dollars for each violation
and up to one hundred thousand one million dollars aggregate for all violations in a
calendar year. The commissioner of insurance is authorized to suspend the
imposition of the fines authorized under pursuant to this Section.
* * *
§1019.3. Enforcement provisions; penalties; regulations
* * *
D.
* * *
(2) The commissioner may refuse to renew, suspend, or revoke the certificate
of authority of any health insurance issuer violating any of the provisions of this
Subpart, or in lieu of suspension or revocation of a license duly issued, the
commissioner may levy a fine not to exceed one thousand dollars for each violation
per health insurance issuer, up to one hundred thousand million dollars aggregate for
all violations in a calendar year per health insurance issuer, when if such violations,
in his opinion, after a proper hearing, warrant the refusal, suspension, or revocation
of such certificate, or the imposition of a fine. The commissioner of insurance is
authorized to may withhold fines imposed under pursuant to this Subpart. Such
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 903 ENROLLED
hearing shall be held in the manner provided in Chapter 12 of this Title, R.S. 22:2191
et seq. Additionally, the commissioner may take any other administrative action,
including imposing those fines and penalties enumerated in R.S. 22:18.
* * *
§1529. Penalties
* * *
B. A monetary penalty not to exceed five hundred dollars may be imposed
for each violation. No fine or fines shall be imposed against a lessor, pursuant to this
Section, which aggregates in excess of ten one hundred thousand dollars in any
calendar year.
* * *
§1554. License denial, nonrenewal, or revocation
A. The commissioner may place on probation, suspend, revoke, or refuse to
issue, renew, or reinstate an insurance producer license, or may levy a fine not to
exceed five hundred dollars for each violation occurring, up to ten one hundred
thousand dollars aggregate for all violations in a calendar year per applicant or
licensee, or any combination of actions, for any one or more of the following causes:
* * *
§1672. License denial, nonrenewal, or revocation
A. The commissioner of insurance may place on probation, suspend, revoke,
or refuse to issue, renew, or reinstate a claims adjuster's license or may levy a fine
not to exceed five hundred dollars for each violation up to ten one hundred thousand
dollars aggregate for all violations in a calendar year, unless a fine is established by
separate statute in this Title authorizing a greater penalty, or any combination of
actions, for any one or more of the following causes:
* * *
§1770. Penalties for violations
In the event that any provision of this Part or other applicable provision of
this Title is violated by a limited licensee, the commissioner may revoke, suspend,
refuse to renew, or levy a fine not to exceed one thousand dollars for each violation,
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 903 ENROLLED
up to one hundred thousand million dollars in the aggregate for all violations in a
calendar year per limited licensee, or impose such other penalty as the commissioner
may deem necessary or convenient to carry out the purposes of this Part.
* * *
§1808.8. License denial, suspension, nonrenewal, or revocation
A. The commissioner of insurance may place on probation, suspend, revoke,
or refuse to issue, renew, or reinstate an insurance consultant license, or may levy a
fine not to exceed five hundred dollars for each violation occurring, up to ten one
hundred thousand dollars aggregate for all violations in a calendar year per applicant
or licensee, or any combination of these actions, for any one or more of the following
causes:
* * *
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.